test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-mwtlw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - mõtlõ: # Verb 59 'eng /est mõelda/fin' - full paradigm
     mõtlõ+V+Inf: mõtlõ
     mõtlõ+V+Ger: mõtlõs
     mõtlõ+V+Sup: mõtlõm
     mõtlõ+V+Sup+Ine: mõtlõmõs
     mõtlõ+V+Sup+Ela: mõtlõmõst
     mõtlõ+V+Sup+Tra: mõtlõmõks
     mõtlõ+V+Sup+Abe: mõtlõmõt
     mõtlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mõtlõb
     mõtlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mõtlõt
     mõtlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mõtlõbõd
     mõtlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mõtliz
     mõtlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mõtlizt, mõtliztõ]
     mõtlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mõtlizt, mõtliztõ]
     mõtlõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: mõtlõ
     mõtlõ+V+Cond+Sg3: mõtlõks
     mõtlõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: mõttõl
     mõtlõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: mõttõl
     mõtlõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: mõtlõgid
     mõtlõ+V+Jus+Sg3: mõtlõg
     mõtlõ+V+Quo+Sg3: mõtliji
     mõtlõ+V+ActPrfPrc: mõtlõn
     mõtlõ+V+PssPrfPrc: mõttõltõd
